Arkansas, session 2025, SB182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-14-904(b)(1)(A)(ii), concerning the
procedure for appropriations by a quorum court, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(c)(1) If a quorum court does not pass an
annual appropriation ordinance as required under subdivision (b)(1)(A)(ii)(a)
of this section by January 1, the annual appropriation ordinance from the
previous year, including any amendments to the annual appropriation budget
adopted by ordinance that were enacted on or before December 31 of the year
of the annual appropriation ordinance, is readopted by operation of this
subdivision (b)(1)(A)(ii)(c), at the final level of appropriation and the
beginning level of zero (0) expenditure.
*SSS134*
02/03/2025 4:31:11 PM SSS134

SB182
(2) Expenditures of the county,
including without limitation the payment of salaries to employees as the
employee's salary existed on December 31, shall continue to be paid under the
annual appropriation ordinance levels of the previous year until a new annual
appropriation ordinance is adopted.
(3) Expenditures of the county paid
under subdivision (b)(1)(A)(ii)(c)(2) of this section shall not include per
diem compensation for the justices of the peace under § 14-14-1205 or salary
for the county judge under § 14-14-1204(c).
(4) An annual appropriation ordinance
adopted by the quorum court after January 1 shall not include per diem
compensation for the justices of the peace under § 14-14-1205 or salary for
the county judge under § 14-14-1204(c) for any period when the previous
year's annual appropriation ordinance has been readopted.
(5) For the purposes of this subdivision
(b)(1)(A)(ii)(c), the annual appropriation ordinance adopted by the quorum
court in the previous year shall be readopted by operation of this
subdivision (b)(1)(A)(ii)(c) regardless of any determination that the annual
appropriation ordinance for the previous year is or may be invalid.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-14-1204(c), concerning compensation of
elected county officers, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read
as follows:
(3) If an annual appropriation ordinance is not adopted by
January 1 under § 14-14-904, the annual salary of a county judge shall not be
paid until an annual appropriation ordinance is adopted.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-14-1205(a)(1), concerning compensation
of township officers, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as
follows:
(C) If an annual appropriation ordinance is not adopted by
January 1 under § 14-14-904, the per diem compensation for justices of the
peace shall not be paid until an appropriation ordinance is adopted.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 14-58-202 is amended to read as follows:
14-58-202. Adoption of budget.
02/03/2025 4:31:11 PM SSS134

SB182
(a) Under this subchapter, the governing body of the municipality
shall, on or before February 1 of each year, adopt a budget by ordinance or
resolution for operation of the city or town municipality.
(b)(1) If the governing body of the municipality has not adopted a
budget by ordinance for the operation of the municipality by January 1, any
expenditure of the municipality for that year shall continue to be paid
according to the adopted budget from the previous year, including any
amendments to the budget adopted by ordinance that were enacted on or before
December 31 of the year of the budget, until a new budget for the year is
adopted by the governing body of the municipality.
(2) The expenditures of the municipality paid under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section shall be limited to necessary operational expenses of
the municipality, including without limitation:
(A) Expenditures to ensure all regular and usual
government services offered by the municipality are maintained;
(B) Expenditures necessary to protect the peace, health,
and safety of the residents of the municipality;
(C) Payroll and benefits of employees of the municipality
as the employee's salary existed on December 31;
(D) Payments of contracts for commodities or services
previously entered into by the municipality in which payment is due; and
(E) Payments of outstanding debt or bonds, including
interest, as authorized under applicable law.
(3) Expenditures authorized under this subsection do not include
a new capital purchase based on prior authorization for a capital purchase in
the adopted budget from the previous year.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that when the governing body of a
county or municipality does not pass an annual appropriation ordinance, the
county or municipality cannot provide basic services and the employees of the
county or municipality cannot be paid; that this act will allow expenditures
to be paid until an annual appropriation ordinance is in place; that the lack
of an appropriation ordinance makes it impossible for the county or
municipality to provide necessary services to the residents of the county or
municipality, which threatens the public peace, health, and safety of the
02/03/2025 4:31:11 PM SSS134

SB182
residents of the county or municipality; and that this act is immediately
necessary because failure to pass an annual appropriation ordinance puts
employees of the county or municipality in financial distress and at risk of
being unable to pay for financial responsibilities. Therefore, an emergency
is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.























02/03/2025 4:31:11 PM SSS134